src/fst/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! Zero Sg morpheme for non NI-4w cases
@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.person.NULL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when no other morphology
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@@R.sg.I@0    NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when -im-poss
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@R.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! 0-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@+Sg:@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@@D.poss.PL@@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ; ! -i-singular (NI-4w), when singular possession and 0-im

! ----------
! Test cases for various noun stem types
! To eventually be moved to under: src/morphology/stems/nouns*.lexc
! ----------

! LEXICON N_INDEP_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NA_0_STEMS ; ! NA stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.IM@   NA_IM_STEMS ; ! NA stems that require -im in possession
! @U.im.NULL@ NI_0_STEMS ; ! NI stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.IM@   NI_IM_STEMS ; ! NI stems that require -im in possession - likely do not exist
! 
! LEXICON NA_0_STEMS
! astotin NA ;
! 
! LEXICON NA_IM_STEMS
! âmow NA "bee" ;
! sîsîp NA "duck" ;
! 
! LEXICON NI_0_STEMS
! askiy NI "land" ;
! astotin NI "hat" ;
! mâcîs NI "camp" ;
!
! LEXICON NI_IM_STEMS
! xxx NI "yyy" ;
! xxx NI "yyy" ;

! LEXICON N_DEP_NONKIN_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! @U.im.NULL@ NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS ; ! NID stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! 
! LEXICON NAD_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! masakay:asakay NAD "skin" ;
! 
! LEXICON NID_0_NONKIN_STEMS
! mihtawakay:htawakay NID "ear" ;
! mispiton:spiton NID "arm" ;
!
! LEXICON N_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
! @U.im.NULL@ NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! NAD stems that traditionally do not take -im in possession
! ! @U.im.NULL@ NI_0_KINSHIP_STEMS ; ! The are no NID kinship stems
!
! LEXICON NAD_0_KINSHIP_STEMS
! -ohkom:ohkom NAD "grand-mother" ;
! -ôhtawiy:ôhtawiy NAD "father" ;
! -tânis:tânis NAD "daughter, brother, sister" ;

!!! Alternative via setting flag-diacritics via case-specific continuation classes
! IM: default without -im, needs to be required.
! DIM: default with both -is and -isis, either one needs to be required

! NA 
! LEXICON NA_0
! @P.im.NULL@@P.is.IS@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;


LEXICON NOUN_IRREGULARS
! Irregular forms of ôsi
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg:nitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg:kitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg:otôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl:nitôtinân OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl:kitôtinaw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl:kitôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl:otôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl:otôtiyiw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
! Locative combos
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtiyihk # ;
! Regular forms of atim, which cannot be possessed
! atim+N+A+Sg:atim # ;
! atim+N+A+Pl:atimwak # ;
! atim+N+A+Obv:atimwa # ;
! atim+N+A+Loc:atimohk # ;
! "Irregular" forms of atim, which are the ones that can be possessed
! @P.person.NI@atim+N+A:@P.person.NI@nitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.KI@atim+N+A:@P.person.KI@kitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.O@atim+N+A:@P.person.O@otêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON OSI_SUFFIXES
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:a # ;

! Case-specific continuation lexica for -im/0 and -is/-isis

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

! NI

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

! NAD 

LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@U.sg.A@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NAD_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

! NID

LEXICON NID_SG/I
@U.sg.I@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NID_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

!! NOUN_ENDLEX for wrapping up various things

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX
! Adding diminutive trigger to lexicalized diminutives to palatalize potential poss. person prefixes
@R.dim.DIM@:@R.dim.DIM@%^DIM # ;
@D.dim@ # ;

!! End of noun affixes code
